n11.dix
<dictionary>
<alphabet>
abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwxyzABCDEFGHIJKLMNOPQRSTUVWXYZ
</alphabet>
<sdefs>
<sdef n="n" c="cat=noun"/>
<sdef n="m" c="gender=masculine"/>
<sdef n="f" c="gender=feminine"/>
<sdef n="o" c="gender=other"/>
<sdef n="sg" c="number=singular"/>
<sdef n="pl" c="number=plural"/>
<sdef n="nom" c="case=nominative"/>
<sdef n="acc" c="case=accusative"/>
<sdef n="ins" c="case=instrumental"/>
<sdef n="dat" c="case=dative"/>
<sdef n="abl" c="case=ablative"/>
<sdef n="gen" c="case=genitive"/>
<sdef n="loc" c="case=locative"/>
<sdef n="voc" c="case=vocative"/>
</sdefs>
<pardefs>
<pardef n="hudug/a_n">
        <e><p>
                <l>anu</l>
                <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>aru</l>
                <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p></e>
        <e><p>
                <l>anannu</l>
                <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>arannu</l>
                <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p></e>
        <e><p>
                <l>aniMxa</l>
                <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>ariMxa</l>
                <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p></e>
        <e><p>
                <l>anigeV</l>
				<r>a<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="m"/></r>
		</p></e>		
		<e><p>
				<l>anigAgi</l>
				<r>a<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="m"/></r>
		</p></e>		
		<e><p>
				<l>anigoskara</l>
                <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p></e>
        <e><p>
                <l>arigeV</l>
				<r>a<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="m"/></r>
		</p></e>		
		<e><p>
				<l>arigAgi</l>
				<r>a<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="m"/></r>
		</p></e>		
		<e><p>
				<l>arigoskara</l>
                <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>ana deVseVyiMxa</l>
                <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p></e>
        <e><p>
                <l>ara deVseVyiMxa</l>
                <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>aniMxa</l>
                <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>ariMxa</l>
                <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>ana</l>
                <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p></e>
        <e><p>
                <l>ara</l>
                <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>analli</l>
                <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p></e>
        <e><p>
                <l>aralli</l>
                <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p></e>		
        <e><p>
                <l>neV</l>
                <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>A</l>
                <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>reV</l>
                <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="puswaka/_n">
        <e><p>
                <l>vu</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="o"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>galYu</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="o"/></r>
        </p></e>
        <e><p>
                <l>vannu</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/><s n="o"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>galYannu</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/><s n="o"/></r>
        </p></e>
        <e><p>
                <l>xiMxa</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/><s n="o"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>galYiMxa</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/><s n="o"/></r>
        </p></e>
        <e><p>
                <l>kkeV</l>
				<r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="o"/></r>
		</p></e>		
		<e><p>
				<l>kkAgi</l>
				<r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="o"/></r>
		</p></e>		
		<e><p>
				<l>kkoskara</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="o"/></r>
        </p></e>
        <e><p>
                <l>galYigeV</l>
				<r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="o"/></r>
		</p></e>		
		<e><p>
				<l>galYigAgi</l>
				<r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="o"/></r>
		</p></e>		
		<e><p>
				<l>galYigoskara</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="o"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>xa deVseVyiMxa</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/><s n="o"/></r>
        </p></e>
        <e><p>
                <l>lYa deVseVyiMxa</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/><s n="o"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>xiMxa</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/><s n="o"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>galYiMxa</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/><s n="o"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>xa</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="o"/></r>
        </p></e>
        <e><p>
                <l>lYa</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/><s n="o"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>xalli</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/><s n="o"/></r>
        </p></e>
        <e><p>
                <l>galYalli</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/><s n="o"/></r>
        </p></e>		
        <e><p>
                <l>ve</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/><s n="o"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>galYe</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/><s n="o"/></r>
        </p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="vENika"><i>vENik</i><par n="hudug/a_n"/></e>
<e lm="vyApArasWa"><i>vyApArasW</i><par n="hudug/a_n"/></e>
<e lm="akRarajFa"><i>akRarajF</i><par n="hudug/a_n"/></e>
<e lm="aXama"><i>aXam</i><par n="hudug/a_n"/></e>
<e lm="anirIkRiwa"><i>anirIkRiw</i><par n="hudug/a_n"/></e>
<e lm="AcArya"><i>AcAry</i><par n="hudug/a_n"/></e>
<e lm="Arya"><i>Ary</i><par n="hudug/a_n"/></e>
<e lm="upAXyAya"><i>upAXyAy</i><par n="hudug/a_n"/></e>
<e lm="buxXivaMwa"><i>buxXivaMw</i><par n="hudug/a_n"/></e>
<e lm="Bata"><i>Bat</i><par n="hudug/a_n"/></e>
<e lm="madivaMwa"><i>madivaMw</i><par n="hudug/a_n"/></e>
<e lm="maneVhAlYa"><i>maneVhAlY</i><par n="hudug/a_n"/></e>
<e lm="mAtagAra"><i>mAtagAr</i><par n="hudug/a_n"/></e>
<e lm="mAvuwa"><i>mAvuw</i><par n="hudug/a_n"/></e>
<e lm="mulla"><i>mull</i><par n="hudug/a_n"/></e>
<e lm="mexAra"><i>mexAr</i><par n="hudug/a_n"/></e>
<e lm="moVmmaga"><i>moVmmag</i><par n="hudug/a_n"/></e>
<e lm="yAjFika"><i>yAjFik</i><par n="hudug/a_n"/></e>
<e lm="raMjaka"><i>raMjak</i><par n="hudug/a_n"/></e>
<e lm="ruxra"><i>ruxr</i><par n="hudug/a_n"/></e>
<e lm="lipikAra"><i>lipikAr</i><par n="hudug/a_n"/></e>
<e lm="vacanaBraRta"><i>vacanaBraRt</i><par n="hudug/a_n"/></e>
<e lm="vara"><i>var</i><par n="hudug/a_n"/></e>
<e lm="vAxaka"><i>vAxak</i><par n="hudug/a_n"/></e>
<e lm="vixURaka"><i>vixURak</i><par n="hudug/a_n"/></e>
<e lm="vIkRaka"><i>vIkRak</i><par n="hudug/a_n"/></e>
<e lm="vExya"><i>vExy</i><par n="hudug/a_n"/></e>
<e lm="SikRaka"><i>SikRak</i><par n="hudug/a_n"/></e>
<e lm="saMpAxaka"><i>saMpAxak</i><par n="hudug/a_n"/></e>
<e lm="sarapaMca"><i>sarapaMc</i><par n="hudug/a_n"/></e>
<e lm="sirivaMwa"><i>sirivaMw</i><par n="hudug/a_n"/></e>
<e lm="susaMskqwa"><i>susaMskqw</i><par n="hudug/a_n"/></e>
<e lm="sWApaka"><i>sWApak</i><par n="hudug/a_n"/></e>
<e lm="haNeVgaNNa"><i>haNeVgaNN</i><par n="hudug/a_n"/></e>
<e lm="haswaka"><i>haswak</i><par n="hudug/a_n"/></e>
<e lm="hAsyagAra"><i>hAsyagAr</i><par n="hudug/a_n"/></e>
<e lm="heVdda"><i>heVdd</i><par n="hudug/a_n"/></e>
<e lm="karaNika"><i>karaNik</i><par n="hudug/a_n"/></e>
<e lm="kArakUna"><i>kArakUn</i><par n="hudug/a_n"/></e>
<e lm="kudiya"><i>kudiy</i><par n="hudug/a_n"/></e>
<e lm="kqwajFa"><i>kqwajF</i><par n="hudug/a_n"/></e>
<e lm="koradiga"><i>koradig</i><par n="hudug/a_n"/></e>
<e lm="goVgga"><i>goVgg</i><par n="hudug/a_n"/></e>
<e lm="cora"><i>cor</i><par n="hudug/a_n"/></e>
<e lm="dAMbika"><i>dAMbik</i><par n="hudug/a_n"/></e>
<e lm="wuruRka"><i>wuruRk</i><par n="hudug/a_n"/></e>
<e lm="xaSakaMTa"><i>xaSakaMT</i><par n="hudug/a_n"/></e>
<e lm="xuMxugAra"><i>xuMxugAr</i><par n="hudug/a_n"/></e>
<e lm="XUrwa"><i>XUrw</i><par n="hudug/a_n"/></e>
<e lm="nissIma"><i>nissIm</i><par n="hudug/a_n"/></e>
<e lm="pAlaka"><i>pAlak</i><par n="hudug/a_n"/></e>
<e lm="pOra"><i>pOr</i><par n="hudug/a_n"/></e>
<e lm="POjuxAra"><i>POjuxAr</i><par n="hudug/a_n"/></e>
<e lm="SArIrika"><i>SArIrika</i><par n="puswaka/_n"/></e>
<e lm="anunAsika"><i>anunAsika</i><par n="puswaka/_n"/></e>
<e lm="aMxuka"><i>aMxuka</i><par n="puswaka/_n"/></e>
<e lm="avakASa"><i>avakASa</i><par n="puswaka/_n"/></e>
<e lm="avasara"><i>avasara</i><par n="puswaka/_n"/></e>
<e lm="AraMba"><i>AraMba</i><par n="puswaka/_n"/></e>
<e lm="uxreka"><i>uxreka</i><par n="puswaka/_n"/></e>
<e lm="bIsara"><i>bIsara</i><par n="puswaka/_n"/></e>
<e lm="BARAMwAra"><i>BARAMwAra</i><par n="puswaka/_n"/></e>
<e lm="mawa"><i>mawa</i><par n="puswaka/_n"/></e>
<e lm="mahApUra"><i>mahApUra</i><par n="puswaka/_n"/></e>
<e lm="muMdana"><i>muMdana</i><par n="puswaka/_n"/></e>
<e lm="melYa"><i>melYa</i><par n="puswaka/_n"/></e>
<e lm="raMXra"><i>raMXra</i><par n="puswaka/_n"/></e>
<e lm="rAhukAla"><i>rAhukAla</i><par n="puswaka/_n"/></e>
<e lm="lAjAhoma"><i>lAjAhoma</i><par n="puswaka/_n"/></e>
<e lm="vakra"><i>vakra</i><par n="puswaka/_n"/></e>
<e lm="vAksvAwaMwrya"><i>vAksvAwaMwrya</i><par n="puswaka/_n"/></e>
<e lm="vicAraSIla"><i>vicAraSIla</i><par n="puswaka/_n"/></e>
<e lm="viroXa"><i>viroXa</i><par n="puswaka/_n"/></e>
<e lm="vExqSya"><i>vExqSya</i><par n="puswaka/_n"/></e>
<e lm="SArIra"><i>SArIra</i><par n="puswaka/_n"/></e>
<e lm="saMkarRaNa"><i>saMkarRaNa</i><par n="puswaka/_n"/></e>
<e lm="saMviXAna"><i>saMviXAna</i><par n="puswaka/_n"/></e>
<e lm="samavasaraNa"><i>samavasaraNa</i><par n="puswaka/_n"/></e>
<e lm="sAMgopAMga"><i>sAMgopAMga</i><par n="puswaka/_n"/></e>
<e lm="siMha"><i>siMha</i><par n="puswaka/_n"/></e>
<e lm="seVlYeVwa"><i>seVlYeVwa</i><par n="puswaka/_n"/></e>
<e lm="svayaMvara"><i>svayaMvara</i><par n="puswaka/_n"/></e>
<e lm="harixAlYa"><i>harixAlYa</i><par n="puswaka/_n"/></e>
<e lm="huMba"><i>huMba</i><par n="puswaka/_n"/></e>
<e lm="Ociwya"><i>Ociwya</i><par n="puswaka/_n"/></e>
<e lm="kamaMdala"><i>kamaMdala</i><par n="puswaka/_n"/></e>
<e lm="kAla"><i>kAla</i><par n="puswaka/_n"/></e>
<e lm="keVywa"><i>keVywa</i><par n="puswaka/_n"/></e>
<e lm="kRullaka"><i>kRullaka</i><par n="puswaka/_n"/></e>
<e lm="galla"><i>galla</i><par n="puswaka/_n"/></e>
<e lm="gocara"><i>gocara</i><par n="puswaka/_n"/></e>
<e lm="caraNa"><i>caraNa</i><par n="puswaka/_n"/></e>
<e lm="CApa"><i>CApa</i><par n="puswaka/_n"/></e>
<e lm="jogulYa"><i>jogulYa</i><par n="puswaka/_n"/></e>
<e lm="wabala"><i>wabala</i><par n="puswaka/_n"/></e>
<e lm="wucPa"><i>wucPa</i><par n="puswaka/_n"/></e>
<e lm="xabbalYa"><i>xabbalYa</i><par n="puswaka/_n"/></e>
<e lm="xIha"><i>xIha</i><par n="puswaka/_n"/></e>
<e lm="xviwva"><i>xviwva</i><par n="puswaka/_n"/></e>
<e lm="nAgavAsa"><i>nAgavAsa</i><par n="puswaka/_n"/></e>
<e lm="nivAsa"><i>nivAsa</i><par n="puswaka/_n"/></e>
<e lm="patuwva"><i>patuwva</i><par n="puswaka/_n"/></e>
<e lm="paviwra"><i>paviwra</i><par n="puswaka/_n"/></e>
<e lm="puRpa"><i>puRpa</i><par n="puswaka/_n"/></e>
<e lm="praBAwa"><i>praBAwa</i><par n="puswaka/_n"/></e>
<e lm="baMXana"><i>baMXana</i><par n="puswaka/_n"/></e>
